Massachusetts, session 194th, H3393.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46 Section 2A of the General Laws is hereby amended by deleting
the following words in section 2A: -
In line 1 – delete “children born out of wedlock or” and
In line 4 – delete “or those of persons born out of wedlock,”
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 1